Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 2. University of Alaska Scholarships for Natives.

Collateral references. —

15A Am. Jur. 2d Colleges and Universities, §§ 20, 34.

14A C.J.S. Colleges and Universities, §§ 32-34.

Sec. 14.43.050.
Purpose of scholarships.

Because of the language difficulty and economic conditions of the Native peoples of the state, and the necessity for integrating the Native cultures with the state economy, it is the purpose of the legislature to provide assistance to Natives who wish to pursue a higher education beyond the attainments possible in the free public schools system.

History.

(§ 1 ch 140 SLA 1955)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

14.40.510

. Renumbered in 1982.

Sec. 14.43.055.
Scholarships.

The Board of Regents of the University of Alaska shall offer not more than 15 new scholarships for each academic year to Alaska Natives desiring to attend the University of Alaska. The board shall give preference to Natives residing in the rural areas of the state who desire to receive training in the field of education.
If there are more than 15 applications the board shall award 15 scholarships to those applicants who have the highest scholastic record or who the board determines are the most qualified among the applicants and who are financially unable to obtain a higher education without assistance.
The University of Alaska shall provide such minimum financial assistance to these students as is necessary in each individual case, but not exceeding fees, board, and room.

History.

(§ 3 ch 140 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 6 SLA 1960)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 14.40.520. Renumbered in 1982.

Sec. 14.43.060.
Continuation of scholarships.

The award of free room and board shall be made from any funds available to the University of Alaska. Each Native who receives a scholarship under AS

14.43.050

—

14.43.075

is entitled to retain the scholarship and to receive free room and board during attendance at the University of Alaska as long as the student maintains a grade average equivalent to a “C” or better.
However, no Native is entitled to the scholarship for more than four years, or for more than the number of years necessary to receive a bachelor’s degree.

History.

(§ 4 ch 140 SLA 1955)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 14.40.530. Renumbered in 1982.

Sec. 14.43.065.
Scholarships in addition to other scholarships.

The scholarships under AS

14.43.050

—

14.43.075

are supplemental and in addition to any other scholarship to which an applicant is entitled or may receive.

History.

(§ 5 ch 140 SLA 1955)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 14.40.540. Renumbered in 1982.

In 1992, “under AS

14.43.050

—

14.43.075

” was inserted to correct a manifest error of omission in the codification of § 5, ch. 140, SLA 1955.

Sec. 14.43.075.
Definition of Native.

In AS

14.43.050

—

14.43.075

, “Native” means a person between the ages of 17 and 25 who is a descendant of a member of the aboriginal races inhabiting the state when annexed to the United States, or who is a descendant of an Indian or Eskimo who, since the year 1867 and prior to June 30, 1952, migrated into the state from Canada, and who is a descendant having at least one-quarter blood derived from these ancestors.

History.

(§ 2 ch 140 SLA 1955)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 14.40.550. Renumbered in 1982.